Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.99.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Eligible student" means a resident student who is enrolled in an accredited doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathic medicine program in the state, is making satisfactory progress, and has declared an intention to work as a physician in a rural underserved area in Washington following residency.

(2) "Medical student loan" means a loan that is approved by the office and awarded to a participant under the program.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(4) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a medical student loan under the program.

(5) "Program" means the medical student loan program.

(6) "Rural underserved area" means a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370 that is also designated by the health resources and services administration as a medically underserved area or having a medically underserved population.

[ 2018 c 209 s 1.]